Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1116
Election contests and recounts; costs.

Except for election contests involving a member of the Legislature under the Legislative Qualifications and Election Contests Act, the cost of election contests under sections 32-1101 to 32-1117 and recounts under section 32-1118 shall be adjudged against the petitioner if he or she loses the contest, and if the petitioner wins the contest, the cost shall be adjudged against the state, county, or other political subdivision of which such contested office was a part. The payment of such costs shall be enforced as in civil cases.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 359;

Laws 2018, LB744, § 7.

Legislative Qualifications and Election Contests Act, see section 50-1501.